Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.33] CAUSE OF ACTION; NONCONSENSUAL REMOVAL OF A CONDOM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Condom" means a thin sheath worn on a person's penis during a sexual act as a contraceptive or as a protection against infection. new text end new text begin (c) "Intimate part" means the sexual organ, anus, groin, or buttocks of any person, or the breast of a female. new text end new text begin (d) "Sexual battery" means an act that causes contact between a sexual organ, from which a condom has been removed, and the intimate part of another who did not verbally consent to the removal of the condom. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Civil action; damages. new text end new text begin (a) A person who commits a sexual battery upon another is liable to that person for damages, including but not limited to general damages, special damages, and punitive damages. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the damages under paragraph (a), the court may award the following damages to a prevailing plaintiff from a person found liable under this section: new text end new text begin (1) a civil penalty of an amount up to $10,000; new text end new text begin (2) equitable relief, including an injunction, costs, and any other relief the court deems appropriate; and new text end new text begin (3) reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (c) The rights and remedies provided in this section are in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by law. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Confidentiality. new text end new text begin The court shall allow confidential filings to protect the privacy of the plaintiff in cases filed under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date. new text end